zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具零件/配件 > 船艇零件/配件: 停港装置; 帆船部件; 船舶护理; 船用发动机配件; 船舶引擎/发动机; 船舶排气装置; 船舶燃油系统; 船舶照明; 游艇操舵零件
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıt Parçaları ve Aksesuarlar > Su Jetli Tekne Parçaları ve Aksesuarları: Havuzlama ve Demir Atma; Yelkenli Tekne Parçaları; Tekne Bakımı; Tekne Motoru Parçaları; Tekne Motorları; Tekne Egsoz Parçaları; Tekne Yakıt Sistemleri; Tekne Lambaları; Tekne Dümeni Parçaları
vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Bộ phận và phụ kiện xe cộ > Bộ phận & linh kiện tàu thuyền: Neo đậu tàu thuyền; Phụ kiện thuyền buồm; Dịch vụ chăm sóc tàu thủy; Phù tùng động cơ tàu thủy; Động cơ & Mô-tơ tàu thủy; Bộ phận xả của tàu thủy; Hệ thống nhiên liệu tàu thuyền; Thiết bị chiếu sáng dùng cho tàu thuyền; Hệ thống lái tàu thuyền
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Piese și accesorii pentru vehicule > Piese și accesorii pentru ambarcațiuni: Andocare și ancorare; Piese pentru ambarcațiuni cu pânze; Îngrijirea ambarcațiunilor; Piese motor ambarcațiuni; Motoare ambarcațiuni; Piese evacuare ambarcațiuni; Sisteme combustibil ambarcațiuni; Iluminat pentru ambarcațiuni; Piese direcție pentru ambarcațiuni
it: Veicoli e parti > Componenti e accessori per auto > Parti e accessori imbarcazioni: Ponti e ancoraggi; Parti barche a vela; Cura imbarcazioni; Parti motore imbarcazioni; Motori imbarcazioni; Parti di scarico imbarcazioni; Impianti carburante imbarcazioni; Illuminazione per natanti; Parti timoni imbarcazioni
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeugersatzteile & -zubehör > Wasserfahrzeugteile & Zubehör: Anlegen & Ankern; Segelbootteile; Wasserfahrzeugpflege; Wasserfahrzeugmotorteile; Wasserfahrzeugantriebe & -motoren; Wasserfahrzeugauspuffteile; Kraftstoffsysteme für Wasserfahrzeuge; Beleuchtung für Wasserfahrzeuge; Wasserfahrzeugsteuerung
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物用パーツ・関連用品 > 船舶パーツ・関連用品: 係船用品; ヨット関連パーツ; 船舶メンテナンス用品; 船舶用エンジンパーツ; 船舶用エンジン・モーター; 船舶排気系パーツ; 船舶燃料系; 船舶用ライト; 船舶用ステアリングパーツ
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicle Parts & Accessories > Watercraft Parts & Accessories: Docking & Anchoring; Sailboat Parts; Watercraft Care; Watercraft Engine Parts; Watercraft Engines & Motors; Watercraft Exhaust Parts; Watercraft Fuel Systems; Watercraft Lighting; Watercraft Steering Parts
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvojen osat ja tarvikkeet > Veneen osat ja tarvikkeet: Kiinnitys ja ankkurointi; Purjeveneen osat; Veneen hoito; Veneen moottorin osat; Veneen moottorit; Veneen pakojärjestelmän osat; Veneen polttoainejärjestelmät; Veneen valaistus; Veneen ohjauksen osat
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Deli in dodatki za vozila > Deli in dodatki za vodna plovila: Privezovanje in sidranje; Deli za jadrnice; Nega vodnih plovil; Deli motorjev za vodna plovila; Motorji in pogonske enote za vodna plovila; Deli za izpušne sisteme vodnih plovil; Sistemi za gorivo za vodna plovila; Razsvetljava za vodna plovila; Deli za krmiljenje plovil
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járműalkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Vízijármű-alkatrészek és -kiegészítők: Dokkolás és horgonyzás; Vitorla-alkatrészek; Vízijármű-gondozás; Vízijárműmotor-alkatrészek; Vízijármű-motorok; Vízijárműkipufogó-alkatrészek; Vízijárműüzemanyag-rendszerek; Vízijármű-világítás; Vízijárműkormányzási alkatrészek
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Deler og tilbehør til kjøretøy > Båtdeler og -tilbehør: Legge til og ankre; Seilbåtdeler; Båtpleie; Motordeler for båt; Båtmotorer; Eksosdeler for båt; Bensinsystemer for båt; Belysning for båt; Styredeler for båt
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Vandens transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai: Švartavimasis ir inkarai; Burinių valčių dalys; Vandens transporto priemonių priežiūra; Vandens transporto priemonių variklių dalys; Vandens transporto priemonių varikliai; Vandens transporto priemonių išmetimo sistemos dalys; Vandens transporto priemonių degalų sistemos; Vandens transporto priemonių apšvietimas; Vandens transporto priemonių vairo sistemų dalys
bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Автомобилни части и аксесоари > Части и аксесоари за плавателни съдове: Акостиране и закотвяне; Части за ветроходна лодка; Грижи за плавателни съдове; Части за двигатели на плавателни съдове; Двигатели и мотори на плавателни съдове; Части за система изпускателна система на плавателни съдове; Горивни системи за плавателни съдове; Осветление на плавателни съдове; Кормилни части за плавателни съдове
pl: Pojazdy i części > Akcesoria i części do pojazdów > Części i akcesoria do jednostek pływających: Dokowanie i kotwiczenie; Części do łodzi żaglowych; Konserwacja i pielęgnacja jednostek pływających; Części silników do jednostek pływających; Silniki do jednostek pływających; Części układu wydechowego do jednostek pływających; Układy paliwowe do jednostek pływających; Oświetlenie do jednostek pływających; Części układu sterowania do jednostek pływających
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordonsdelar och tillbehör > Delar och tillbehör till fartyg: Dockning och ankring; Segelbåtsdelar; Vård av fartyg; Motordelar till fartyg; Fartygsmotorer; Delar till avgassystem för fartyg; Bränslesystem för fartyg; Fartygslampor; Delar till fartygsstyrsystem
hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Dijelovi i oprema za vozila > Dijelovi i dodaci za plovila: Pristajanje i sidrenje; Dijelovi za jedrilice; Njega plovila; Dijelovi motora za plovila; Motori za plovila; Dijelovi ispušne cijevi za plovila; Sustavi goriva za plovila; Rasvjeta za plovila; Dijelovi za upravljanje plovilima
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Peças e acessórios de veículos > Peças e acessórios para embarcações: Doca e ancoragem; Peças para veleiros; Cuidados com embarcações; Peças de motor de embarcações; Motores de embarcações; Peças de escapamento de embarcações; Sistemas de combustível de embarcações; Iluminação para embarcações; Peças de direção de embarcações
el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ οχημάτων > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ για σκάφη: Πρόσδεση & αγκυροβόληση; Ανταλλακτικά ιστιοπλοϊκών; Φροντίδα σκαφών; Ανταλλακτικά κινητήρων σκαφών; Μηχανές & κινητήρες σκαφών; Μέρη εξάτμισης σκαφών; Συστήματα καυσίμου σκαφών; Φωτισμός σκαφών; Ανταλλακτικά συστήματος διεύθυνσης σκαφών
es: Vehículos y recambios > Piezas y accesorios para vehículos > Accesorios y piezas para embarcaciones: Atracada y anclaje; Piezas para veleros; Cuidado para embarcaciones; Piezas de motor de embarcaciones; Motores y engranajes para embarcaciones; Piezas de escape para embarcaciones; Sistemas de combustible para embarcaciones; Iluminación para embarcaciones; Piezas de dirección para embarcaciones
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigonderdelen en -accessoires > Onderdelen en accessoirs voor vaartuigen: Aanleggen en voor anker gaan; Onderdelen voor zeilboten; Onderhoud voor vaartuigen; Motorbesturingen voor vaartuigen; Motoren voor vaartuigen; Uitlaatonderdelen voor vaartuigen; Brandstofsystemen voor vaartuigen; Verlichting voor watervoertuigen; Stuuronderdelen voor vaartuigen
da: Køretøjer og dele > Dele og tilbehør til køretøjer > Dele og tilbehør til fartøjer: Dokning og anker; Dele til sejlbåde; Pleje af fartøjer; Motordele til fartøjer; Motorer til fartøjer; Udstødningsdele til fartøjer; Brændstofsystemer til fartøjer; Belysning til fartøjer; Styringsdele til fartøjer
cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Díly a příslušenství vozidel > Díly a příslušenství k motorovým člunům: Uvazování a kotvení; Díly pro plachetnice; Péče o motorové čluny; Díly motorů motorových člunů; Motory motorových člunů; Výfuky motorových člunů a jejich součásti; Palivové systémy motorových člunů; Osvětlení plavidel; Součásti řízení motorových člunů
fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Pièces détachées pour véhicules > Pièces détachées et accessoires nautiques: Entrée au bassin et ancrage; Pièces détachées pour voiliers; Entretien de bateaux; Pièces de moteur de bateau; Moteurs nautiques; Pièces d’échappement pour bateaux; Systèmes d'alimentation pour bateaux; Éclairage pour navigation; Pièces de direction pour bateaux
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Acessórios e peças para veículos > Acessórios e peças para embarcações: Atracagem e ancoragem; Peças para veleiros; Cuidado de embarcações; Peças de motor para embarcações; Motores para embarcações; Peças de escape para embarcações; Sistemas de combustível para embarcações; Iluminação para embarcações; Peças de direção para embarcações
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Запчасти и аксессуары для транспортных средств > Запчасти и аксессуары для водного транспорта: Швартовка и постановка на якорь; Запчасти для парусников; Товары для ухода за водным транспортом; Детали двигателей для водного транспорта; Двигатели и моторы для водного транспорта; Детали выхлопной системы водного транспорта; Топливные системы водного транспорта; Осветительные приборы для водного транспорта; Детали системы рулевого управления водным транспортом
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre plavidlá: Parkovanie v prístave a ukotvenie; Diely plachetníc; Starostlivosť o plavidlá; Diely motora plavidla; Motory pre plavidlá; Diely výfuku plavidla; Palivové systémy plavidiel; Osvetlenie plavidiel; Diely riadenia plavidiel
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 부품/부대용품 > 선박 부품/부대용품: 입거/계류; 범선 부품; 선박 관리; 선박 엔진 부품; 선박 엔진/모터; 선박 배기 부품; 선박 연료 장치; 선박등; 선박 조타 장치 부품
th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สำหรับยานยนต์ > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์เรือ: การเทียบท่าและการทอดสมอ; ชิ้นส่วนเรือใบ; การดูแลเรือ; อะไหล่เครื่องยนต์เรือ; เครื่องยนต์และมอเตอร์เรือ; อะไหล่ท่อไอเสียเรือ; ระบบเชื้อเพลิงของเรือ; ไฟบนเรือ; ชิ้นส่วนบังคับเลี้ยวของเรือ
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛零件/配件 > 船艇零件/配件: 停泊用零配件; 帆船零件; 船艇維護; 船艇引擎零件; 船艇引擎/馬達; 船艇排水管零件; 船艇燃料系統; 船艇照明; 船艇操控零件